Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 22 Judicial Council And Judicial Conference [Repealed]

22.010.
Members — Presiding officer. [Repealed.]

22.020.
Meetings — Who required to attend. [Repealed.]

22.030.
Duties — Reports to Council and to Legislature — Hearings. [Repealed.]

22.040.
Compensation of members — Expenses. [Repealed.]

22.050.
Judicial council — Membership — Chief justice — Terms — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

22.060.
Judicial conference — Membership — Chairman. [Repealed.]

22.070.
Meetings of council and conference — Chairman of council. [Repealed.]

22.080.
Duties of judicial council. [Repealed.]

22.090.
Duties of judicial conference. [Repealed.]

22.100.
Expenses of members of council and conference. [Repealed.]

22.110.
Administrative office of the courts established — Director — Other employes. [Repealed.]

22.120.
Duties of director. [Repealed.]